Utah statutes.
47-3-102.   Definitions.

As used in this chapter:

(1)  "Air gun" means a .177 or .20 caliber, or equivalent 4.5mm or 5.0mm, pellet rifle or pellet pistol whose projectile is pneumatically propelled by compressed air or compressed gas such as carbon dioxide.

(2)  "Certified official" means a Range Safety Officer, Firearms Instructor, or Shooting Coach certified by the National Rifle Association or equivalent national shooting organization.

(3)  "Group" means any organized club, organization, corporation or association which at the time of use of the shooting range has a certified official in charge while shooting is taking place and while the range is open.

(4)  "Military range" means a shooting range located on a state military installation.

(5)  "Nonmilitary range" means a shooting range that is not a military range.

(6)  "Political subdivision" has the same meaning as defined in Section 17B-2-101 and includes a school district.

(7)  "Public funds" means funds provided by the federal government, the state, or a political subdivision of the state.

(8)  "Shooting range" or "range" means an area designed and continuously operated under nationally recognized standards and operating practices for the use of rifles, shotguns, pistols, silhouettes, skeet, trap, black powder, archery, or any other similar shooting activities.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 155, 2013 General Session

